apertium-pol.pol.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 31429
	Sdefs: 89
	Paradigms: 1038
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-pol.pol.dix apertium-pol.pol1.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáÄäBbCcČčDdĎďEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlĽľĹĺMmNnŇňOoÓóÔôŌōÕõÃãŎŏPpQqRrŔŕSsŠšTtŤťUuÚúVvWwXxYyÝýZzŽžĄąĆćĘęŁłŃńÓóŚśQqŻżŹźÁČĎÉĚÍŇŘŠŤÚŮÝŽáčďéěíňřšťúůýžĕ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="rzeczownik"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="liczebnik"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="przymiotnik"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="przysłówek"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="czasownik"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="czasownik być"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="czasownik mieć"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="czasownik posiłkowy"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="przyimek"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="zaimek"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="określnik"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="wykrzyknik"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="spójnik przysłówkowy"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="spójnik współrzędny"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="spójnik podrzędny"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="męski (nazwa własna)"/> 
    <sdef n="mp" 	c="męski"/> 
    <sdef n="ma" 	c="męski żywotny"/> 
    <sdef n="mi" 	c="męski nieżywotny"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="żeński"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="nijaki"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="męski albo/i żeński"/> 
    <sdef n="nm" 	c="niemęski (np 'Polaki' a nie 'Polacy')"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="nazwa własna"/> 
    <sdef n="hyd" 	c="hydronim"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="miejsce"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="imię"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="nazwisko"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="altres"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="pierwsza osoba"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="druga osoba"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="trzecia osoba"/> 
    <sdef n="impers" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="mianownik"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="dopełniacz"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="celownik"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="biernik"/> 
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="narzędnik"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="miejscownik"/> 
    <sdef n="voc" 	c="wołacz"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="liczba pojedyncza"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="liczba mnoga"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="pojedyncza albo/i mnoga"/> 
    <sdef n="cnt" 	c="policzalne"/> 
    <sdef n="unc" 	c="niepoliczalne"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="czas przeszły"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="czas teraźniejszy"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c="czas teraźniejszy - nieużywany"/> 
    <sdef n="fut" 	c="czas przyszły"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="tryb rozkazujący"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="bezokolicznik"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" 	c="tryb przypuszczający"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="rzeczownik odczasownikowy"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="rodzajnik określony (wskazujący)"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="dzierżawczy"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="pytający"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="rodzajnik nieokreślony"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="zwrotny"/> 
    <sdef n="impf" 	c="czasownik niedokonany"/> 
    <sdef n="perf" 	c="czasownik dokonany"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="przymiotnik albo przysłówek mający stopień wyższy/najwyższy"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="stopień wyższy"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="stopień najwyższy"/> 
    <sdef n="emph" 	c="wymowny"/> 
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="akronim"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="indecl" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="cpd" /> 
    <sdef n="po" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="ppr" /> 
    <sdef n="lquot" /> 
    <sdef n="rquot" /> 
    <sdef n="dim" /> 
    <sdef n="uns" /> 
    <sdef n="abbr" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->
<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="np__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="quotes">
  <e>       <p><l>„</l>         <r>„<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>“</l>         <r>“<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <i>1</i><p><l></l>  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[2-4]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[5-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-zA-Z0-9.]+&#64;[a-zA-Z0-9.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>
      <re>(http:&#47;&#47;|https:&#47;&#47;|ftp:&#47;&#47;)?[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9](([\-_])?[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9])*(.[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9](([\-_])?[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(&#47;([ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*&#47;)*([ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[ąęóśłżźćńŏãōôõa-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re>
      <p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ip">
    <e><re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re>
      <p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef> -->

    <!-- Interjunctions -->
<pardef n="cześć__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="DOS">             <i>DOS</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="GPU">             <i>GPU</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="IP">              <i>IP</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ISO">             <i>ISO</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="Kč">              <i>Kč</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="NAT">             <i>NAT</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="TCP">             <i>TCP</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="WYSIWYG">         <i>WYSIWYG</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="api">             <i>api</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ascii">           <i>ascii</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bmp">             <i>bmp</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="br">              <i>br</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ca">              <i>ca</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="czw">             <i>czw</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dag">             <i>dag</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fr">              <i>fr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="gif">             <i>gif</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="godz">            <i>godz</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="gr">              <i>gr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ha">              <i>ha</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="hl">              <i>hl</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="i.in.">           <i>i<b/>in.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="inż">             <i>inż</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="itp">             <i>itp</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ul.">             <i>ul.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="wg"><i>wg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dyr"><i>dyr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dkg"><i>dkg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="pw"><i>pw</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="wyd"><i>wyd</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tv"><i>tv</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="szt"><i>szt</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ww."><i>ww.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="jpg">             <i>jpg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kb">              <i>kb</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kcal">            <i>kcal</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kpt">             <i>kpt</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kwi">             <i>kwi</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="lut">             <i>lut</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="max">             <i>max</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mg">              <i>mg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mgr">             <i>mgr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mies">            <i>mies</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="min">             <i>min</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mjr">             <i>mjr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mld">             <i>mld</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mln">             <i>mln</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ok">              <i>ok</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="p.">              <i>p.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pn">              <i>pn</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="png">             <i>png</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pon">             <i>pon</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="r.">              <i>r.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="rep">             <i>rep</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="s.a.">            <i>s.a.</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sob">             <i>sob</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="str">             <i>str</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="svg">             <i>svg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tab">             <i>tab</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tel">             <i>tel</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tydz">            <i>tydz</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tyg">             <i>tyg</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tzn">             <i>tzn</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="utf">             <i>utf</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="wrz">             <i>wrz</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="wto">             <i>wto</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="śr">              <i>śr</i><par n="np__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ach">             <i>ach</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="aha">             <i>aha</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="cześć">           <i>cześć</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="do jutra">        <i>do<b/>jutra</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="do widzenia">     <i>do<b/>widzenia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="do zobaczenia">   <i>do<b/>zobaczenia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="dobranoc">        <i>dobranoc</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="dobry wieczór">   <i>dobry<b/>wieczór</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="dzień dobry">     <i>dzień<b/>dobry</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="dziękuję bardzo"> <i>dziękuję<b/>bardzo</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="halo">            <i>halo</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="hej">             <i>hej</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="miłego dnia">     <i>miłego<b/>dnia</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="mniam">           <i>mniam</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="na zdrowie">      <i>na<b/>zdrowie</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nie ma sprawy">   <i>nie<b/>ma<b/>sprawy</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nie ma za co">    <i>nie<b/>ma<b/>za<b/>co</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="och">             <i>och</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="pa">              <i>pa</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="proszę">          <i>proszę</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="przepraszam">     <i>przepraszam</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="przykro mi">      <i>przykro<b/>mi</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="smacznego">       <i>smacznego</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="z przyjemnością"> <i>z<b/>przyjemnością</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e lm="amen">            <i>amen</i><par n="cześć__ij"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="quotes"/></e>
